Colorado statutes. TITLE 16 Criminal Proceedings
PART 1 PEACE OFFICERS
16-2.5-149. City attorney - town attorney - senior assistant city attorney - assistant city attorney - chief deputy city attorney - deputy city attorney - special deputy city attorney - prosecuting attorney - senior prosecuting attorney - senior prosecutor - special prosecutor.

A city attorney, town attorney, senior assistant city attorney, assistant city attorney, chief deputy city attorney, deputy city attorney, special deputy city attorney, prosecuting attorney, senior prosecuting attorney, senior prosecutor, or special prosecutor employed or contracted by a municipality, city, town, statutory city or town, or city and county is a peace officer only while engaged in the performance of his or her duties as a prosecutor. Such peace officer's authority shall include the enforcement of all laws of the municipality, city, town, statutory city or town, or city and county and the state of Colorado, and the peace officer may be certified by the P.O.S.T. board.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, the peace officer status conferred by subsection (1) of this section shall not be available to an attorney specified in subsection (1) of this section who chooses to practice as a criminal defense attorney in the state of Colorado while also working as a prosecuting attorney or an attorney who contracts with a municipality, city, town, statutory city or town, or city and county, local government to serve as a city attorney, town attorney, senior assistant city attorney, assistant city attorney, chief deputy city attorney, deputy city attorney, special deputy city attorney, prosecuting attorney, senior prosecuting attorney, senior prosecutor, or special prosecutor on a less than a full-time basis.

Source:

L. 2012:

Entire section added, (HB 12-1026), ch. 76, p. 256, § 1, effective April 6.

16-2.5-150. Fort Carson police officers.

A Fort Carson police officer is a peace officer while engaged in the performance of his or her duties. Fort Carson police officers are employed by the Fort Carson police, a federal civilian law enforcement agency within the state of Colorado. A Fort Carson police officer's authority includes enforcing all the laws of the constitution of the United States, the United States code, the "Uniform Code of Military Justice", 10 U.S.C. chapter 47, and the laws of the state of Colorado within the jurisdiction and properties of Fort Carson and the Piñon Canyon maneuver site, including all fixed and mobile properties of Fort Carson and the Piñon Canyon maneuver site. A Fort Carson police officer may be P.O.S.T.-certified.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire section added, (SB 13-005), ch. 109, p. 377, § 1, effective August 7.

16-2.5-151. Federal secret service agents.

A special agent, uniform division officer, physical security technician, physical security specialist, or special officer of the United States secret service, referred to in this section as a "secret service agent", in any jurisdiction within the state of Colorado, is a peace officer whose authority is limited as provided in this section. The secret service agent is a peace officer in the following circumstances:

Responding to a nonfederal felony or misdemeanor that has been committed in his or her presence;

Responding to an emergency situation in which he or she has probable cause to believe that a nonfederal felony or misdemeanor involving injury or threat of injury to a person or property has been, or is being, committed and immediate action is required to prevent escape, serious bodily injury, or destruction of property;

Rendering assistance at the request of a Colorado peace officer; or

Effecting an arrest or providing assistance as part of a bona fide task force or joint investigation with Colorado peace officers; and

The secret service agent acts in accordance with the rules and regulations of his or her employing agency.

A secret service agent is a person who is employed by the United States government, assigned to the United States secret service, empowered to effect an arrest with or without a warrant for violations of the United States code, and authorized to carry a firearm and use deadly force in the performance of his or her duties as a federal law enforcement officer.

Upon effecting an arrest under the authority of this section, a secret service agent shall immediately surrender custody of the arrested individual to a Colorado peace officer.

This section does not impose liability on or require indemnification or create a waiver of sovereign immunity by the state of Colorado for any action performed under this section by a secret service agent.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to expand the authority of federal law enforcement officers to initiate or conduct an independent investigation into violations of Colorado law.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire section added, (SB 13-013), ch. 126, p. 424, § 1, effective April 19.

16-2.5-152. Administrator of judicial security.

An administrator of judicial security employed by the judicial department is a peace officer whose authority includes the enforcement of all laws of the state of Colorado, and such administrator of judicial security must be certified by the P.O.S.T. board.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire section added, (HB 18-1210), ch. 69, p. 629, § 1, effective March 22.